Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Files of State Sovereignty Commission

§ 39-5-61.
Files and equipment of state sovereignty commission placed in custody of department; when files become public records.

The files and equipment of the state sovereignty commission are hereby placed in the custody of the department of archives and history. Said files shall be immediately sealed, impounded and maintained as confidential files by the department of archives and history. Any equipment may be used by the department of archives and history in the furtherance of the activities of the said department. On July 1, 2027, such files shall become public records under the custody and control of the department of archives and history.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 320, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 4, 1977).

§ 39-5-63.
Willful tampering with files.

Any person who shall willfully break any seal containing the impounded files of the state sovereignty commission, or willfully examine, divulge, disseminate, alter, remove or destroy said files prior to July 1, 2027, shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, or punished by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 320, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 4, 1977).

§ 39-5-65.
Display of penalties for tampering with files.

The department of archives and history shall conspicuously display the penalties prescribed by Section 39-5-63 in one or more places on each container or cabinet in which the files of the state sovereignty commission are impounded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 320, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 4, 1977).